District of Columbia statutes.
13-448

Application to pending actions.

This chapter applies to requests for discovery in cases pending on May 22, 2010.

May 22, 2010, D.C. Law 18-147, § 2(b), 57 DCR 2552
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.